apertium-hye.hye.dix
    <pardef n="ընկեր__n_aa">
      <e><p>          <l>ոջից</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ոջ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ոջը</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ոջն</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ոջով</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ը</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ն</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ներից</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ների</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ներին</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ներով</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ներ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ները</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ներն</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="քնամ/ուկ__n_aa">
      <e><p>          <l>կնից</l><r>ուկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>կան</l><r>ուկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>կանը</l><r>ուկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>կանն</l><r>ուկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>կնով</l><r>ուկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուկ</l><r>ուկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուկը</l><r>ուկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուկն</l><r>ուկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>կներից</l><r>ուկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>կների</l><r>ուկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>կներին</l><r>ուկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>կներով</l><r>ուկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>կներ</l><r>ուկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>կները</l><r>ուկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>կներն</l><r>ուկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="հորաք/ույր__n_aa">
      <e><p>          <l>րոջից</l><r>ույր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րոջ</l><r>ույր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րոջը</l><r>ույր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րոջն</l><r>ույր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րոջով</l><r>ույր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ույր</l><r>ույր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ույրը</l><r>ույր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ույրն</l><r>ույր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ույրներից</l><r>ույր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ույրների</l><r>ույր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ույրներին</l><r>ույր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ույրներով</l><r>ույր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ույրներ</l><r>ույր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ույրները</l><r>ույր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ույրներն</l><r>ույր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="հ/եր__n_aa">
      <e><p>          <l>որից</l><r>եր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>որ</l><r>եր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>որը</l><r>եր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>որն</l><r>եր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>որով</l><r>եր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>եր</l><r>եր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>երը</l><r>եր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>երն</l><r>եր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>երերից</l><r>եր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>երերի</l><r>եր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>երերին</l><r>եր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>երերով</l><r>եր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>երեր</l><r>եր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>երերը</l><r>եր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>երերն</l><r>եր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="օձաձուկ"><i>օձաձ</i><par n="քնամ/ուկ__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="շնաձուկ"><i>շնաձ</i><par n="քնամ/ուկ__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="գործընկեր"><i>գործընկեր</i><par n="ընկեր__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="հորաքույր"><i>հորաք</i><par n="հորաք/ույր__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="մուկ"><i>մ</i><par n="քնամ/ուկ__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="ձուկ"><i>ձ</i><par n="քնամ/ուկ__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="մորաքույր"><i>մորաք</i><par n="հորաք/ույր__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="դաշտամուկ"><i>դաշտամ</i><par n="քնամ/ուկ__n_aa"/></e>
<e lm="հեր" r="LR"><p><l>հ</l><r>հա</r></p><par n="հ/եր__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="աներ"><i>աներ</i><par n="ընկեր__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="տատմեր"><i>տատմ</i><par n="հ/եր__n_aa"/></e>
<e lm="մեր"><i>մ</i><par n="հ/եր__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="արջամուկ"><i>արջամ</i><par n="քնամ/ուկ__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="քնամուկ"><i>քնամ</i><par n="քնամ/ուկ__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="ընկեր"><i>ընկեր</i><par n="ընկեր__n_aa"/></e>
